New Jersey, session 221, S3948.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A plenary retail consumption license that is used in connection with a premises located on land that is annexed pursuant to N.J.S.40A:7-12 shall be transferred to the governing body of the municipality that annexes the land. b.    A municipality from which land is annexed pursuant to N.J.S.40A:7-12 and that transfers a plenary retail consumption license pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be entitled to issue a new plenary retail consumption license at public sale pursuant to P.L.1975, c.275 (C.33:1-19.1 et seq.) in order to supplant any license transferred pursuant to this section. c.     The population limitation established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1947, c.94 (C.33:1-12.14) shall not apply to a license transferred or issued pursuant to this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.